New Jersey, session 221, S717.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in this section: "Cultural competency" refers to the ability to interact effectively with people of different cultures, socio-economic status, gender, races, ethnic backgrounds, religions, and other diversity categories in a manner that recognizes, affirms, and values the worth of individuals, families, and communities and protects and preserves the dignity of each. "Implicit bias" refers to the attitudes or stereotypes that affect understanding, actions, and decisions in an unconscious manner. b. Any health care professional licensed or certified pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes who provides in-home health care services, other than a homemaker-home health aide, shall be required to complete one credit of  cultural competency and implicit bias training, within one year following the effective date of this act and biennially thereafter. c.  The cultural competency and implicit bias training curriculum shall be developed by the Department of Health, in consultation with relevant professional organizations, which shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1) identification and understanding of implicit biases and stereotypes related to race, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, and disability; (2) communication techniques that account for potential impacts of implicit biases; (3) strategies for recognizing and mitigating unconscious biases in healthcare decision-making processes; (4) review of applicable federal and State laws regarding discrimination in health care services; (5) cultural awareness and cultural competence in healthcare; and (6) understanding health disparities and social determinants of health. d.  The Department of Health shall develop and maintain an electronic database to record compliance with this section. 2.    a. As used in this section: "Cultural competency" refers to the ability to interact effectively with people of different cultures, socio-economic status, gender, races, ethnic backgrounds, religions, and other diversity categories in a manner that recognizes, affirms, and values the worth of individuals, families, and communities and protects and preserves the dignity of each. "Implicit bias" refers to the attitudes or stereotypes that affect understanding, actions, and decisions in an unconscious manner. b. A homemaker-home health aide who provides in-home health care services shall be required to complete one credit of cultural competency and implicit bias training, within one year following the effective date of this act and biennially thereafter. c.  The cultural competency and implicit bias training curriculum shall be developed by the Department of Health, in consultation with relevant professional organizations, which shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1) identification and understanding of implicit biases and stereotypes related to race, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, and disability; (2)  communication techniques that account for potential impacts of implicit biases; (3)  strategies for recognizing and mitigating unconscious biases in healthcare decision-making processes; (4) review of applicable federal and State laws regarding discrimination in health care services; (5)  cultural awareness and cultural competence in healthcare; and (6)  understanding health disparities and social determinants of health. d.  The Department of Health shall develop and maintain an electronic database to record compliance with this section. 3.  The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety and the Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect 90 days following enactment.